Connecticut, session 2026, SB00215.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
Section 1. Subsection (a) of section 3-57a of the general statutes is
repealed and the following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective October
1, 2026):
(a) The following property held or owing by a banking or financial
organization is presumed abandoned unless the owner thereof is known
to be living by an officer of such organization:
(1) Any demand or savings deposit made in this state with a banking
organization, together with any interest or dividend thereon, excluding
any charges that lawfully may be withheld, unless the owner has, within
three years: (A) (i) Increased or decreased the amount of the deposit or
the amount of any other demand or savings deposit contained in any of
the owner's accounts with the banking organization, or (ii) presented the
passbook or other similar evidence of the deposit, or of any other
demand or savings deposit contained in any of the owner's accounts
with the banking organization, for the crediting of interest; or (B)
corresponded in writing with the banking organization concerning the
deposit; or (C) otherwise indicated an interest in the deposit as
LCO 1 of 3

Substitute Bill No. 215
evidenced by (i) a memorandum on file with the banking organization,
[or] (ii) the fact that the Internal Revenue Service Form 1099 sent from
the banking organization to the owner is not returned to the banking
organization by the United States Postal Service, or (iii) the owner
making a payment to the banking organization for the principal or
interest due on a loan made by the banking organization to the owner.
(2) Any matured time deposit made in this state with a banking
organization, together with any interest or dividend thereon, excluding
any charges that lawfully may be withheld, unless, within three years
or, if the terms of the deposit account contract provide that the time
deposit will be renewed unless the banking [institution] organization
receives instructions to the contrary from the owner, within three years
plus such additional time as is necessary to allow the renewed time
deposit to reach maturity, the owner has: (A) Increased or decreased the
amount of the deposit, or presented the passbook or other similar
evidence of the deposit for the crediting of interest, or (B) corresponded
in writing with the banking organization concerning the deposit, or (C)
otherwise indicated an interest in the deposit as evidenced by (i) a
memorandum on file with the banking organization, or (ii) the fact that
the Internal Revenue Service Form 1099 sent from the banking
organization to the owner is not returned to the banking organization
by the United States Postal Service.
(3) Any funds paid in this state toward the purchase of shares or other
interest in a financial organization or any deposit made therewith, and
any interest or dividends thereon, excluding any charges that lawfully
may be withheld, unless the owner has within three years: (A) Increased
or decreased the amount of the investment or deposit, or presented an
appropriate record for the crediting of interest or dividends thereon; or
(B) corresponded in writing with the financial organization concerning
the investment or deposit; or (C) otherwise indicated an interest in the
funds as evidenced by (i) a memorandum on file with the financial
organization, or (ii) the fact that the Internal Revenue Service Form 1099
sent from the financial organization to the owner is not returned to the
financial organization by the United States Postal Service.
LCO 2 of 3

Substitute Bill No. 215
(4) Any sum payable on checks certified in this state or on written
instruments issued in this state on which a banking or financial
organization is directly liable, including, but not limited to, money
orders, drafts and traveler's checks, which has been outstanding for
more than three years from the date payable, or from the date of its
issuance if payable on demand, unless the owner has within such three
years corresponded in writing with the banking or financial
organization concerning it, or otherwise indicated an interest as
evidenced by (i) a memorandum on file with the banking or financial
organization, or (ii) the fact that the Internal Revenue Service Form 1099
sent from the banking or financial organization to the owner is not
returned to the banking or financial organization by the United States
Postal Service.
(5) Any funds or other personal property reposing in or removed
from a safe deposit box or any other safekeeping repository in this state
on which the lease or rental period has expired owing to nonpayment
of rent or other reason, which have been unclaimed by the owner for
more than five years from the date on which the lease or rental period
expired.
This act shall take effect as follows and shall amend the following
sections:
Section 1 October 1, 2026 3-57a(a)
BA Joint Favorable Subst.
LCO 3 of 3